Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-230
City council; mayor; candidate; public officeholder not disqualified from candidacy.

The Legislature, recognizing the importance to the entire State of Nebraska of sound and stable government in cities of the metropolitan class, hereby declares that the qualifications for candidacy for the office of mayor and city council member of such cities, whether any such city is governed by a home rule charter or not, are matters of general statewide concern. The provisions of any ordinance or home rule charter of any such city to the contrary notwithstanding, no person shall be disqualified from candidacy for the office of mayor or city council member of any such city because of the fact that such person holds any other public office, either elective or appointive, except any office subordinate to the mayor and city council of such city, and no holder of any such other office shall be required to resign such other office in order to become and remain a candidate for the office of mayor or city council member of any such city.

Laws 1965, c. 162, § 1, p. 513;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 14;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 60.